Nevada, session 83, SB219.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 205.08345 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
205.08345 1. A person who knowingly participates directly
or indirectly in or engages in conduct with the intent to further an
organized retail theft is guilty of a category B felony and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for:
(a) If the aggregated value of the property or services involved
in all thefts committed in the organized retail theft in this State
-
*SB219*

– 2 –
during a period of 120 days is at least $3,500 but less than $10,000,
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(b) If the aggregated value of the property or services involved
in all thefts committed in the organized retail theft in this State
during a period of 120 days is at least $10,000 [or more,] but less
than $50,000, a minimum term of not less than 2 years and a
maximum term of not more than 15 years, and by a fine of not more
than $20,000.
(c) If the aggregated value of the property or services involved
in all thefts committed in the organized retail theft in this State
during a period of 120 days is $50,000 or more, a minimum term
of not less than 3 years and a maximum term of not more than 20
years, and by a fine of not more than $30,000.
2. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order a
person who violates this section to pay restitution.
3. For the purposes of this section, in determining the
aggregated value of the property or services involved in all thefts
committed in the organized retail theft in this State during a period
of 120 days:
(a) The amount involved in a single theft shall be deemed to be
the highest value, by any reasonable standard, of the property or
services which are obtained; and
(b) The amounts involved in all thefts committed by all
participants in the organized retail theft must be aggregated.
4. In any prosecution for a violation of this section, the
violation shall be deemed to have been committed and may be
prosecuted in any jurisdiction in this State in which any theft
committed by any participant in the organized retail theft was
committed, regardless of whether the defendant was ever physically
present in that jurisdiction.
5. The Attorney General may investigate and prosecute a
violation of this section and any other statute violated in the course
of committing a violation of this section.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Internet or network site” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4744.
(b) “Merchant” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 597.850.
(c) “Organized retail theft” means committing, either alone or
with any other person or persons, a series of thefts of retail
merchandise against one or more merchants, either on the premises
of a merchant or through the use of an Internet or network site, in
this State with the intent to:
(1) Return the merchandise to the merchant for value; or
-
*SB219*

– 3 –
(2) Resell, trade or barter the merchandise for value in any
manner, including, without limitation, through the use of an Internet
or network site.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB219*